Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.640.900

Chapter supplementary.

This chapter shall be supplementary to, and shall not supersede, existing law and procedures and future amendments thereto relating to unlawful discrimination based on sex.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.85.900.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 226: See note following RCW 28A.640.010.